Rhode Island statutes. Title 40.1 Behavioral Healthcare, Developmental Disabilities and Hospitals
Chapter 24 Facilities and Programs

40.1-24-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Adult foster home” means a private family living arrangement that, through financial support from the parent deinstitutionalization subsidy aid program, provides housing and supervision to two (2) or more persons with mental illness, addiction/substance abuse disorders, or who are persons with developmental disabilities or otherwise eligible under §

40.1-1-10.1

. Foster homes serving fewer than two (2) adults, foster home situations wherein the foster parents are natural or adoptive parent(s) or grandparents, and any facility licensed by the department of children, youth and families shall be excluded for the purposes of this chapter.

“Community residence” means any home or other living arrangement that is established, offered, maintained, conducted, managed, or operated by any person for a period of at least twenty-four (24) hours, where, on a twenty-four (24) hour basis, direct supervision is provided for the purpose of providing rehabilitative treatment, habilitation, psychological support, and/or social guidance for three (3) or more persons with mental illness, addiction/substance abuse disorders, or who are persons with developmental disabilities or cognitive disabilities such as brain injury. The facilities shall include, but not be limited to, group homes, halfway houses, and fully supervised apartment programs. Semi-independent living programs, foster care, and parent deinstitutionalization subsidy aid programs shall not be considered community residences for the purposes of this chapter.

“Day-treatment program” means any nonresidential facility that is established, offered, maintained, conducted, managed, or operated by any person for a period of less than twenty-four (24) hours to provide therapeutic intervention to persons with mental illness, addiction/substance abuse disorders, or who are persons with developmental disabilities or cognitive disabilities such as brain injury. These shall include, but not be limited to, outpatient programs for persons with mental illness, addiction/substance abuse disorders or who are persons with developmental disabilities or cognitive disabilities such as brain injury.

“Deemed status” means acceptance by the department of accreditation granted by a national accreditation organization that has been recognized and approved by the department, including, but not limited to, the joint commission, the commission on accreditation of rehabilitation facilities, or the council on accreditation. Accreditation by a national accreditation organization that has been approved by the department shall serve as evidence of compliance with some or all of the department’s rules and regulations for license renewal, as promulgated under §

40.1-24-9

.

“Department” means the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals.

“Facility” means any community residence, day-treatment program, rehabilitation program, public or private, excluding hospitals or units within hospitals for persons with mental illness, addiction/substance abuse disorders or who are persons with developmental disabilities or cognitive disabilities such as brain injury providing program services that do not constitute medical or custodial care, but do offer rehabilitation, habilitation, psychological support, and social guidance.

“Habilitation program” means any nonresidential facility that is established, offered, maintained, conducted, managed, or operated by any person for a period of less than twenty-four (24) hours to provide training in basic daily living skills and developmental activities, prevocational skills and/or vocational training and placement, and follow-up for people with mental illness, addiction/substance abuse disorders or who are persons with developmental disabilities or cognitive disabilities such as brain injury. These shall include, but not be limited to, early intervention, adult development, work activities, sheltered workshops, advanced workshops, and job development and training programs. Sheltered workshops not exclusively for people with mental illness, addiction/substance abuse disorders or who are persons with developmental disabilities or cognitive disabilities such as brain injury shall be excluded for the purposes of this chapter.

“Person” means any individual, governmental unit, corporation, company, association, or joint stock association and the legal successor thereof.

“Program” means a planned service-delivery system structured to provide specific components that are responsive to the needs of those served.

“Rehabilitation program” means any facility, that is established, offered, maintained, conducted, managed, or operated by any person to provide restorative therapy and/or training to persons with mental illness, addiction/substance abuse disorders or who are persons with developmental disabilities or cognitive disabilities such as brain injury. These shall include, but not be limited to, community mental health centers. Sheltered workshops not exclusively for people with mental illness, addiction/substance abuse disorders or who are persons with developmental disabilities or cognitive disabilities such as brain injury shall be excluded for the purposes of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 160, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 150, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

23-43.3-1

; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 166, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 418, § 8; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 14, § 16; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 112; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 112; P.L. 2001, ch. 385, § 2; P.L. 2001, ch. 389, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 351, § 3; P.L. 2005, ch. 394, § 3; P.L. 2011, ch. 152, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 171, § 2.

40.1-24-2.
Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to provide for the development, establishment, and enforcement of standards:

For facilities and programs providing rehabilitation, psychological support, and social guidance to individuals who are alcoholic, drug abusers, mentally ill, or who are persons with developmental disabilities or cognitive disabilities such as brain injury;

For the construction, maintenance, and operation of facilities that will promote safe and adequate accommodations for individuals who are alcoholic, drug abusers, mentally ill, or who are persons with developmental disabilities or cognitive disabilities such as brain injury; and

For the establishment of a comprehensive licensing policy with respect to facilities and programs for people who are alcoholic, drug abusers, mentally ill, or who are persons with developmental disabilities or cognitive disabilities such as brain injury.

The department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals is hereby authorized and directed to be the licensing authority in Rhode Island for residential and other support programs designed specifically for persons with cognitive disabilities such as brain injury. These licensure requirements shall be the same standards for persons with developmental disabilities except that for these purposes all references to “developmental disabilities” shall mean “cognitive disabilities.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 160, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 150, § 2; G.L. 1956, § 23-43.3-2; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 14, § 16; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 112; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 112; P.L. 2001, ch. 385, § 2; P.L. 2001, ch. 389, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 351, § 3; P.L. 2005, ch. 394, § 3.

40.1-24-3.
License requirement.

No person or governmental unit, acting severally or jointly with any other person or governmental unit, shall establish, conduct, or maintain a facility or program as defined in this chapter in this state without a license under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 160, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 150, § 2; G.L. 1956, § 23-43.3-3; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1.

40.1-24-4.
Application for license.

An application for a license shall be made to the department upon forms provided by it and shall contain such information as the department reasonably requires, which may include affirmative evidence of ability to comply with such reasonable standards, rules, and regulations as are lawfully prescribed pursuant to this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 160, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 23-43.3-4; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 140.

40.1-24-5.
Issuance of license — Transfer.

Upon receipt of an application for license, the department shall issue a license if the applicant meets the requirements established under this chapter. If all the requirements under this chapter are not met, the department may issue a provisional license for a period not to exceed six (6) months if the issuance will not result in undue hazard to residents or clients. A license issued under this chapter shall be the property of the state and loaned to the licensee, and it shall be kept in an accessible place at all times on the licensed premises. Each license shall be issued only for the premises and persons or governmental units named in the application and shall not be transferable or assignable except with the written approval of the department.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 160, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 150, § 2; G.L. 1956, § 23-43.3-5; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 140.

40.1-24-6.
Expiration and renewal of license.

A license, other than a provisional license, unless sooner suspended or revoked, shall remain in full force and effect until renewed by approval of the department in accordance with procedures for renewal set forth in rules and regulations to be adopted by the department pursuant to §

40.1-24-9

; the procedures must include a process by which a license shall be renewed on the basis of deemed status as defined in §

40.1-24-1

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 160, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 150, § 2; G.L. 1956, § 23-43.3-6; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 166, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 152, § 3; P.L. 2011, ch. 171, § 3.

40.1-24-7.
Denial, suspension, or revocation of license.

Deemed status shall not prohibit the department from taking any licensing action it deems necessary.

The department, after notice and opportunity for a hearing to the applicant or licensee, is authorized to deny, suspend, or revoke a license in any case in which it finds that there has been failure to comply with the requirements established under this chapter. The notice shall be effected by registered or certified mail or by personal service, setting forth the particular reasons for the proposed action and fixing a date not less than thirty (30) days from the date of the mailing or service, at which the applicant or licensee shall be given an opportunity for a prompt and fair hearing.

On the basis of any hearing, or upon default of the applicant or licensee, the department shall make a determination specifying its findings of fact and conclusions of law. A copy of the determination shall be sent by registered or certified mail or served personally upon the applicant or licensee. The decision denying, suspending, or revoking the license or application shall become final thirty (30) days after it is so mailed or served, unless the applicant or licensee, within the thirty-day (30) period, appeals the decision to the superior court, pursuant to §

40.1-24-8

. The procedure governing hearings authorized by this section shall be in accordance with rules promulgated by the department.

A full and complete record shall be kept of all proceedings, and all testimony shall be reported but need not be transcribed unless the decision is appealed pursuant to §

40.1-24-8

. A copy or copies of the transcript may be obtained by any interested party on payment of the cost of preparing the copy or copies. Witnesses may be subpoenaed by either party.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 160, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 23-43.3-7; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 216, § 31; P.L. 2011, ch. 152, § 3; P.L. 2011, ch. 171, § 3.

40.1-24-8.
Review of license action.

Any applicant or licensee or the state acting through the attorney general, aggrieved by the decision of the department after a hearing may, within thirty (30) days after the mailing or serving of notice of the determination, as provided in §

40.1-24-7

, file a notice of appeal in the superior court of the county in which the facility or program is located, or to be located, and serve a copy of the notice of appeal upon the department. The appeal shall serve as a stay of the denial, suspension, or revocation on being filed with the clerk of the court for a period not to exceed thirty (30) days not counting Sundays or legal holidays for a further period of thirty (30) days from the day of serving of the notice. If the appeal has not been heard or disposed of within the thirty-day (30) period, the denial, suspension, or revocation shall no longer be stayed but shall remain in full force and effect during any further pendency of the appeal unless the superior court shall, for good cause shown, extend the period of the stay, but in no event shall the period be extended beyond the date when the superior court shall render its judgment upon the appeal.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 160, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 150, § 2; G.L. 1956, § 23-43.3-8; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1.

40.1-24-9.
Rules, regulations, and standards.

The department shall adopt, amend, promulgate, and enforce such rules, regulations, and standards with respect to all facilities and programs licensed under this chapter as may be designed to further the accomplishment of the purposes of this chapter in promoting safe and adequate facilities and programs in the interest of public health, safety, and welfare.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 160, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 150, § 2; G.L. 1956, § 23-43.3-9; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 140.

40.1-24-10.
Time allowed for compliance with new rules or standards.

Any facility that is in operation at the time of promulgation of any applicable rules or regulations or minimum standards under this chapter shall be given a reasonable time, not to exceed one year from the date of promulgation of any applicable rules or regulations or minimum standards, within which to comply with the rules and regulations and minimum standards.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 160, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 23-43.3-10; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1.

40.1-24-11.
Inspections and investigations — Alterations or new construction.

The department shall make or cause to be made such inspections and investigations that it deems necessary. Deemed status shall not prohibit the department from conducting any inspection and/or investigation it deems necessary. The department may prescribe by regulations that any licensee or applicant desiring to make a specified type of alteration or addition to its facilities or to construct new facilities shall, before commencing the alteration, addition, or new construction, submit plans and specifications thereto to the department for preliminary inspection and approval or recommendations with respect to compliance with the regulations and standards herein authorized. Necessary conference and consultations may be provided.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 160, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 23-43.3-11; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 152, § 3; P.L. 2011, ch. 171, § 3.

40.1-24-12.
Confidentiality of information.

Information received by the department through filed reports, inspection, or as otherwise authorized under this chapter, shall not be disclosed publicly in such manner as to identify individuals or facilities and programs, except in a proceeding involving the question of licensure.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 160, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 150, § 2; G.L. 1956, § 23-43.3-12; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1.

40.1-24-13.
Annual report of activities.

The department shall prepare and publish an annual report of its activities and operations under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 160, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 23-43.3-13; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1.

40.1-24-14.
Operation of unlicensed facility.

Any person establishing, conducting, managing, or operating any facility, as defined in this chapter, without a license pursuant to this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisoned not more than six (6) months, or both, in the discretion of the court, for each offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 160, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 23-43.3-14; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1.

40.1-24-15.
Injunction to restrain operation without license.

Notwithstanding the existence or pursuit of any other remedy, the department may, in the manner provided by law upon the advice of the attorney general who shall represent the department in the proceedings, maintain an action in the name of the state for injunction or other process against any person or governmental unit to restrain or prevent the establishment, conduct, management, or operation of a facility, as defined in this chapter, without a license pursuant to this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 160, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 23-43.3-15; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1.

40.1-24-16.
Institutions to which chapter inapplicable.

The provisions of this chapter shall not be construed to apply to substance abuse facilities, infant’s boarding homes, day nurseries, or homes for aged or convalescent persons (chapters 17 and 17.4 of title 23 and chapter 13 of title 40 [repealed]).

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 160, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 23-43.3-16; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 14, § 16.

40.1-24-17.
Power to enforce chapter.

The director of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals shall have power to enforce the provisions of this chapter in any and all applications of this chapter that involve the regulation and licensing of facilities, programs, persons, community residences, day-treatment programs, habilitation programs, rehabilitation programs, and adult foster homes intended to provide services to people who are alcoholics, drug abusers, mentally ill or who are persons with developmental disabilities.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 160, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 23-43.3-17; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 418, § 8; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 14, § 16; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 112; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 112; P.L. 2001, ch. 385, § 2; P.L. 2001, ch. 389, § 1.

40.1-24-18.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstance shall be held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect the provisions or application of this chapter that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of the chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 160, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 23-43.3-18; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1.

40.1-24-19.
Aftercare programs.

All community residences that provide care for people who are mentally ill, or alcohol and/or drug abusers, that are funded in whole or in part by state funds, shall establish an aftercare program. The program shall require the following:

A minimum of two (2) follow-up contact attempts to be made within six (6) months after discharge. The follow-up attempts, successful or unsuccessful, shall be recorded in the client record. This documentation shall include:

In the case of successful follow-up, a summary of the client’s progress or regression shall be noted in the record.

In the case of an unsuccessful follow-up, a record shall be made of:

Date and time of attempted contact.

Type of contact.

Reason for unsuccessful contact.

Plan for future follow-up contact attempt.

The program shall be operated with existing funds appropriated pursuant to this chapter.

Evaluation and monitoring of this program shall be conducted annually by the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 424, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 112; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 112.

40.1-24-20.
Human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) testing — Facilities for drug users.

Every physician or healthcare provider attending any person for any service offered at a facility for intravenous drug users shall offer testing for human immunodeficiency virus (HIV). All testing pursuant to this section shall be performed in accordance with the provisions of chapter 6.3 of title 23.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 405, § 5; P.L. 1990, ch. 169, § 2; P.L. 2000, ch. 171, § 5; P.L. 2006, ch. 599, § 9; P.L. 2009, ch. 196, § 8; P.L. 2009, ch. 289, § 8.

40.1-24-21.
Competency evaluation and training programs for residential instructors.

Individuals employed as residential instructors in privately and publicly operated residential programs for persons who are developmentally disabled, licensed pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, shall successfully pass a qualifying competency evaluation or complete a training program. Competency evaluation and training programs must be approved by the division of developmental disabilities of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals and incorporated into the department’s rules, regulations, and standards for licensing facilities pursuant to this chapter of this title. The residential instructor competency evaluation and curriculum shall be assembled by December 31, 1991. Those employees hired after December 31, 1991, shall complete the required residential instructor training within the first six (6) months of employment. The competency evaluations for staff employed as of June 18, 1991, shall be completed by March 31, 1992.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 301, § 2; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 112; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 112; P.L. 2001, ch. 385, § 2.